District of Columbia statutes.
21-588

Forms.

All applications and certificates for the hospitalization of a person in the District of Columbia under this chapter shall be made on forms approved by the Commission on Mental Health and furnished by it.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1973 Ed., § 21-588.
1981 Ed., § 21-588.
This section is referenced in § 21-589.